District of Columbia statutes.
7-503.06

Transfer of funds and positions from Division of Services to the Aging.

The Division of Services to the Aging presently located within the Department of Human Resources, and all positions and unexpended funds presently allocated to this Division are hereby transferred to the new Office created under § 7-503.01.

Oct. 29, 1975, D.C. Law 1-24, title III, § 306, 22 DCR 2459
1981 Ed., § 6-2216.
1973 Ed., § 6-1716.